Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 5

Accounts

45-3-501. Deposit liability.

The deposit liability of an association shall consist only of the aggregate amount of deposit accounts of its depositors, plus interest credited to the accounts, less redemption and withdrawal payments.

Except as limited by the board of directors from time to time, a depositor may make additions to the depositor's deposit accounts in the amounts and at the times that the depositor may elect.

Deposit accounts shall be open for cash.

Interest shall be declared in accordance with this chapter.

No preference between depositors shall be created with respect to the distribution of assets upon voluntary or involuntary liquidation, dissolution, or winding up of an association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.01; T.C.A., § 45-1401.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 45-1401 — 45-1411 (Acts 1875, ch. 142, § 14; 1919, ch. 136, §§ 1, 2, 5-7, 10, 13; Shan., § 2139; Shan. Supp., §§ 2179a1, 2179a2, 2179a5-2179a7, 2179a10, 2179a12; Acts 1929, ch. 117, §§ 2, 4; Code 1932, §§ 3900-3902, 3905, 3906, 3908, 3913, 3916, 3918; Acts 1933, ch. 19, §§ 5, 7, 8; 1935, ch. 137, § 1; 1935, ch. 152, §§ 1, 2; 1937, ch. 77, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 3898.13-3898.22, 3898.30 (Williams, §§ 3898.5, 3898.7, 3898.8, 3900, 3902, 3905.1, 3905.2, 3906)), concerning loans and investments by building and loan associations, were repealed by Acts 1974, ch. 698, § 5 and replaced by Acts 1974, ch. 698, §§ 2, 6-16, codified in §§ 45-1401 — 45-1412, which in turn were repealed by Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 6.01 and the present material substituted therefor.

For transfer of functions under this chapter from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of financial institutions, see Executive Order No. 38 (February 11, 1983).

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 11.

45-3-502. Authorization of deposit accounts.

Acceptance of Deposit Accounts. An association may accept deposit accounts of any type and in any form not prohibited by this chapter or by other applicable law or by rules and regulations of the commissioner. An association shall not accept accounts other than deposit accounts; provided, that in the event of a conversion of a federal association to a state association, savings accounts in the federal association, existing at the time it so converts shall remain savings accounts unless and until they are exchanged for deposit accounts. Exchanges of savings accounts shall be governed by rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner.

Priority of Deposit Accounts. In any situation in which the priority of deposit accounts is to be determined or is in controversy, deposit accounts shall be debts of the association having the same priority as the claims of general creditors of the association not having priority, other than any priority arising or resulting from consensual, or, if so determined by a court, equitable, subordination, over other general creditors of the association.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.02; T.C.A., § 45-1402.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 11.

45-3-503. Nature of deposit accounts.

Ownership. Deposit accounts may be opened by any person and held solely and absolutely in the person's own right, or jointly by, or in trust or other fiduciary capacity for, any person or persons, including, but not limited to, an adult or minor individual, male, female, single or married, partnership, association, fiduciary, corporation, political subdivision or any governmental, public or quasi-public entity specifically referred to in § 9-1-107.

Transfer of Accounts. Deposit accounts shall be represented only by the account of each depositor on the books of the association, and the accounts or any interest in the accounts shall be transferable only on the books of the association upon proper application by the transferor or transferee and upon acceptance by the association of the transferee as a depositor upon terms approved by the board of directors. The association may treat the holder of record of a deposit account as the owner of the account for all purposes without being affected by any notice to the contrary unless the association has acknowledged, in writing, notice of a pledge or other transfer of the deposit account.

Deposit Account Contract. Subject to the prior approval by the commissioner of the form of each type of deposit account contract, each depositor shall execute a deposit account contract setting forth any special terms and provisions applicable to the deposit account and the ownership of the account and the conditions upon which withdrawals may be made. The contracts shall be held by the association as part of its records pertaining to the account, and a copy of the contract shall be furnished to the depositor.

Evidence of Ownership. An association shall issue evidence of accounts that the commissioner may authorize.

Inducements. For the opening or increasing of any deposit account, no association shall, directly or indirectly, give, sell, dispose of, or otherwise advertise or permit the giving, selling, or disposition of, for any one (1) opening or increase, anything having a cost or value in excess of amounts permitted with respect to federal associations by applicable federal law and regulation, but inducement shall be allowed to the extent permitted to federal associations under the applicable federal law and regulation.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.03; T.C.A., § 45-1403.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 11.

45-3-504. Prohibited transactions.

Any other provision of the law to the contrary notwithstanding, no association shall have the authority to receive demand deposit accounts or offer checking accounts, negotiable orders of withdrawal, or share accounts until federal associations in Tennessee are authorized to do so by federal law or regulation.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.04; T.C.A., § 45-1404.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

45-3-505. Contracts for savings programs.

Payroll Savings Programs. An association may contract with any employer with respect to the solicitations, collection, and receipt of savings by payroll deduction to be credited to a designated account or accounts of the employer's employee or employees who voluntarily may participate.

Other Savings Programs. Subject to rules and regulations of the commissioner, an association may contract with any other person or persons, including, but not limited to, educational or charitable institutions, for the participation by the association in any savings plan with the person or persons.

Federally Approved Savings Programs. Any association insured by the federal savings and loan insurance corporation may contract with or enter into any savings program approved by the federal savings and loan insurance corporation.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.05; T.C.A., § 45-1405.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

The federal savings and loan insurance corporation, referred to in this section, was abolished, effective February 1, 1992. See the Historical and Statutory Notes under 12 U.S.C. § 1437.

45-3-506. Power of attorney on accounts.

Any association may continue to recognize the authority of a power of attorney authorizing in writing as attorney-in-fact to operate, in whole or in part, the account of a depositor, unless and until it receives actual notice of the revocation of authority.

Actual notice of the death, adjudication of incompetency, or adjudication of bankruptcy of the depositor shall constitute actual notice of revocation of the authority of the attorney-in-fact, except where the Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act, compiled in title 34, chapter 6, is applicable.

No association shall be liable for damages, penalty, or tax by reason of any payment made pursuant to this section.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.06; T.C.A., § 45-1406; Acts 1983, ch. 299, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 11.

45-3-507. Accounts of minors.

Any association may accept deposit accounts from any minor as the sole and absolute owner of the account, and receive payments on the accounts by or for the owner, and pay withdrawals, accept pledges to the association, and act in any other manner with respect to the accounts on the order of the minor.

Any payment or delivery of rights to any minor, or a receipt of acquittance signed by a minor who holds an account, shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the association for any payment so made or delivery of rights to the minor. The receipt of acquittance signed by a minor who holds an account shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the association for any payment so made or delivery of rights to the minor. The receipt, acquittance, pledge, or other action required by the association to be taken by a minor shall be binding upon the minor with like effect as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity.

The parent or guardian of the minor shall not, in the person's capacity as parent or guardian, have the power to attach or in any manner to transfer any account issued to or in the name of the minor; provided, that in the event of the death of the minor, the receipt or acquittance of either parent or guardian of the minor shall be a valid and sufficient discharge of the association for any sum or sums not exceeding in the aggregate one thousand dollars ($1,000), unless the minor has given written notice not to accept the signature of the parent or guardian.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.07; T.C.A, § 45-1407.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

45-3-508. Accounts in two or more names.

Deposit accounts and certificates of deposit maintained in any association in the names of two (2) or more persons shall be governed by §45-2-703.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.08; T.C.A., § 45-1408; Acts 1988, ch. 926, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 440.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 11.

45-3-509. Pledge to association of an account in joint tenancy.

The pledge or hypothecation to any association of all or part of an account in joint tenancy signed by any tenant or tenants whether minor or adult, upon whose signature or signatures withdrawals may be made from the account, shall, unless the terms of the account provide specifically to the contrary, be a valid pledge and transfer to the association of that part of the account pledged or hypothecated, and shall not operate to sever or terminate the joint and survivorship ownership of all or any part of the account.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.09; T.C.A., § 45-1409.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

45-3-510. Incompetency of a joint tenant.

The adjudication of incompetency of any one (1) or more of the joint tenants shall not operate to sever or terminate the joint tenancy ownership of all or any part of the account, and the account may be withdrawn or pledged by any one (1) or more of the joint owners in the same manner as though the adjudication of incompetency had not been made, except that any withdrawal or pledge on behalf of the incompetent joint owner shall be by guardian or conservator.

Payment of any or all of the moneys in the account shall discharge the association from liability with respect to the moneys so paid.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.10; T.C.A., § 45-1410.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

45-3-511. Accounts of administrators, executors, guardians, custodians, trustees, and other fiduciaries.

Any association may accept accounts in the name of any administrator, executor, custodian, conservator, guardian, trustee, or other fiduciary for a named beneficiary or beneficiaries.

A fiduciary shall have power to vote as a member in a mutual association as if the membership were held absolutely, and shall have power to open and to make additions to, and to withdraw the account in whole or in part from, any association governed by this chapter.

The withdrawal value of the account, and interest on the account, or other rights relating to the account may be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to the fiduciary without regard to any notice to the contrary as long the fiduciary is living.

The payment or delivery to the fiduciary to whom the payment or the delivery of right is made shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of an association for the payment or delivery so made.

Whenever a person holding an account in a fiduciary capacity dies and no written or actual notice of the revocation or termination of the fiduciary relationship has been given to an association, and the association has no written or actual notice of any other disposition of the beneficial estate, either to a successor fiduciary or otherwise, the withdrawal value of the account, and interest on the account, or other rights relating to the account may, at the option of an association, be paid or delivered, in whole or in part, to the beneficiary or beneficiaries.

Whenever an account is opened by any person, describing the person in opening the account as trustee for another and no other or further notice of the existence and terms of a legal and valid trust than the description has been given in writing and to the association, in the event of the death of the person so described as trustee, the withdrawal value of the account or any part of the account, together with the interest on the account, may be paid to the person for whom the account was thus described to have been opened.

The payment or delivery to the beneficiary, beneficiaries, or designated person, or a receipt or acquittance signed by the beneficiary, beneficiaries, or designated person for payment or delivery shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of an association for the payment or delivery so made.

No association paying the fiduciary, beneficiary, or designated person in accordance with this section shall be liable for any estate, inheritance, or succession taxes that may be due this state.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.11; T.C.A., § 45-1411.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

45-3-512. Accounts of incompetents.

When an account is held in any association by a person who becomes incompetent and an adjudication of incompetency has been made by a court of competent jurisdiction, the association may pay or deliver the withdrawal value of the account and any interest that may have accrued on the account to the guardian or conservator for the person upon proof of the appointment and qualification of the guardian or conservator; provided, that if the association has received no written notice and is not on actual notice that the depositor has been adjudicated incompetent, it may pay or deliver the funds to the depositor in accordance with the account contract, and the receipt or acquittance of the depositor shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of the association for the payment or delivery so made.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.12; T.C.A., § 45-1412.

Compiler's Notes. For repeal of the former section, see Compiler's Notes to §45-3-501.

45-3-513. Accounts of deceased nonresidents.

When an account is held in any association by a person residing in another state or country, in the event of the death of the depositor, the account, together with additions to the account, or any part of the account, shall be exempt from any taxation otherwise imposed by this state and may be paid to the administrator or executor appointed in the state or country where the holder resided at the time of death; provided, that the administrator or executor has furnished the association with:

Authenticated copies of the letters of the administrator or executor and of the order of the court that issued the letters to the person authorizing the person to collect, receive, and remove the personal estate; and

An affidavit by the administrator or executor that, to the administrator's or executor's knowledge, no letters then are outstanding in this state and no petition for letters by an heir, legatee, devisee, or creditor of the decedent is pending on the estate in this state, and that there are no creditors of the estate in this state.

Upon payment or delivery to the representative after receipt of the affidavit and authenticated copies, the association is released and discharged to the same extent as if the payment or delivery had been made to a legally qualified resident executor or administrator and is not required to see to the application or disposition of the property.

No action at law or in equity shall be maintained against the association for payment made in accordance with this section.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.13; T.C.A., § 45-1413.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 45-1413 now appears in §45-3-705.

45-3-514. Payment when no executor or administrator qualifies.

Notwithstanding § 30-2-317, where no executor or administrator of a deceased depositor has qualified and given notice of the person's qualification to the association, it may in its discretion and at any time after thirty (30) days from the death of the depositor pay out of all accounts or contents of safe deposit boxes maintained with it by the depositor in an individual capacity all sums that do not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) in the aggregate:

To the executor named in any will known to the association; or

In the absence of knowledge of any purported will naming a surviving executor to:

A creditor for expenses of the funeral;

A creditor for the expenses of the last illness;

The surviving spouse; and

To the next of kin.(2) In the case of conflicting claims, the order of priority shall be that set out in subdivision (a)(1)(B).

The receipt of any guardian, administrator or executor, duly appointed and qualified by the courts of this state or any other state, acknowledging the payment or transfer of funds, standing in the name of the person whose estate the fiduciary represents, in the form of deposits in associations shall be good and sufficient acquittance for the payment or transfer and shall constitute a valid defense in favor of the associations against the demands or claims of all parties.

No association shall be liable for damages, penalty or tax by reason of any payment made pursuant to this section.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.14; T.C.A., § 45-1414; Acts 1983, ch. 191, § 3; 1988, ch. 926, § 8; 1995, ch. 177, § 13; 1997, ch. 426, § 22; 2016, ch. 804, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 45-1414 now appears in §45-3-706.

Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendments to this section by that act shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998 and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, §§ 11, 12.

45-3-515. Account payable on death.

An association may accept deposits made by any person in trust for another or may contract for deposits that may be made payable on the death of the last surviving owner under the same terms and conditions provided by §45-2-704.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.15; T.C.A., § 45-1415; Acts 1993, ch. 39, § 10.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 12.

45-3-516. Accounts as legal investments and as security.

Legal Investments.

In addition to investments in savings and loan associations as authorized by other law, administrators, executors, custodians, conservators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries of every kind and nature, insurance companies, business and manufacturing companies, banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, and other types of similar financial institutions, charitable, educational, eleemosynary corporations, funds and organizations, cemeteries, perpetual care funds, state and local governmental agencies and municipal and other public corporations and bodies, and public officials, including, but not limited to, all officials, boards, agencies, and entities described in §§ 9-1-107 and 35-3-117, and all other legal entities are specifically authorized and empowered to invest or deposit funds held by them, without any order of any court, in accounts of associations covered by this chapter and in accounts of federal associations organized under the laws of the United States and under federal supervision, and the investments shall be deemed and held to be legal investments for the funds.

With respect to investments by custodians, associations are deemed to be “banks” within the meaning of that term as used in [former] § 35-7-102.

The commissioner may by regulation provide that accounts in associations shall be legal investments for any persons, firms, corporations, or entities not herein specifically referred to.

Security. Whenever, under the laws of this state or otherwise, a deposit of securities is required for any purpose, the accounts made legal investments by this section shall be acceptable for deposits, and whenever under the laws of this state or otherwise, a bond is required with security, the bond may be furnished, and the accounts made legal investments by this section in the amount of the bond, when deposited therewith, shall be acceptable as security for the bond without other security.

Provisions Supplemental. This section is supplemental to any and all other laws relating to and declaring what shall be legal investments for the persons, fiduciaries, corporations, organizations and officials referred to in this section, and the laws relating to the deposit of securities and the making and filing of bonds for any purpose.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.16; T.C.A., § 45-1416.

Compiler's Notes. Former §35-7-102, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 664, § 2.

45-3-517. Lien on accounts.

Any association shall have a lien, without further agreement or pledge, upon all accounts owned by any depositor to whom or on whose behalf the association has made an advance of money by loan or otherwise.

Upon the default in the repayment or satisfaction thereof, the association may, after giving ten (10) days' written notice to the depositor, cancel on its books all or any part of the accounts owned by the depositor and apply the value of the accounts in payment on account of the obligation. After the ten-day notice is given, the depositor may withdraw only the funds that are in excess of the amount of the lien.

The depositor shall have thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice within which to object in writing to the validity of the lien. If the depositor objects within that period, the association must, within sixty (60) days after the date of receipt by the association of the objection, file a legal action to enforce the lien and shall be entitled to collect the reasonable expense of the action, including attorney fees.

An association may by written instrument waive its lien in whole or in part on any account.

Any association may accept a pledge of an account or accounts of the association owned by a depositor other than the borrower as additional security for any loan secured by an account or by real estate, or by both.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.17; T.C.A., § 45-1417; Acts 1988, ch. 581, § 1.

45-3-518. Interest on accounts.

An association may pay interest on its deposit accounts from sources available for payment of interest at the rate or rates and at the times and for the time that is determined by resolution of its board of directors. Interest shall be declared on the withdrawal value of each account at the beginning of the accounting period, plus additions to the account made during the period, less amounts previously withdrawn and noticed for withdrawal, which for interest purposes shall be deducted from the latest previous additions to the account, computed at the declared rate for the time the funds have been invested, determined as next provided. The date of investment shall be the date of actual receipt by the association of an account or an addition to an account, except that if the board of directors shall so determine, accounts in one (1) or more classifications or additions thereto received by the association on or before a date not later than the fifteenth day of the month, unless the day determined is not a business day, shall receive interest as if invested on the first day of the month in which the payments were received, and the board also may determine that payments received subsequent to the determination date shall either:

Receive interest as if invested on the first day of the next succeeding month; or

Receive interest from the date of actual receipt by the association.

Notwithstanding this section, the board of directors, by resolution, may determine that interest shall not be paid on any account that has a withdrawal value of a specified amount less than ten dollars ($10.00).

The directors shall determine by resolution the method of calculating the amount of any interest on accounts as herein provided, and the time or times when interest is to be declared, paid or credited.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this section, the commissioner is empowered to promulgate rules and regulations with respect to the payment of interest on deposit accounts, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations concerning the types of deposit accounts that may be offered by associations to depositors and the maximum rates of interest that shall be paid to depositors on each type of deposit account.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.18; T.C.A., § 45-1418.

45-3-519. Withdrawal.

Except for accounts that provide for a specified contractual time or notice before withdrawal or are subject to a pledge, a depositor may at any time present a written order for withdrawal of all or any part of the depositor's account.

Every association shall either pay, or shall number, date, and file in the order of actual receipt every withdrawal order.

Withdrawals shall be made in the order of actual receipt of orders except as otherwise provided by this chapter or by regulation of the commissioner.

Upon order, an association shall pay the amount of the withdrawal order or the withdrawal value of the account; provided, that the association shall not be required to honor any withdrawal order that exceeds the withdrawal value of the account.

The commissioner shall by regulation establish the rules and procedures to apply in the event the association is unable to pay immediately all orders for withdrawal as made, including a rotation plan or any other plan for equitable payment of withdrawals, the payment in full of accounts of less than a specified amount and the application of receipts to withdrawals.

The commissioner may prescribe the circumstances and conditions under which the failure of the association to pay withdrawals as applied for shall be deemed the conduct of its business in an unsound or imprudent manner so as to empower the commissioner to take possession of an association or to take other remedial action as provided by this chapter.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.19; T.C.A., § 45-1419.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Savings and Loan Associations, § 12.

45-3-520. Redemption of accounts.

At any time funds are on hand for the purpose, the association shall have the right to redeem by lot or otherwise, as the board of directors may determine, all or any part of any of its deposit accounts on an interest date by giving thirty (30) days' notice by registered mail addressed to each affected depositor at the depositor's last address as recorded on the books of the association.

No association shall redeem any of its accounts when the association is in an impaired condition or when it has any delinquent applications for withdrawal on file that have not been paid in full.

The redemption price of an account shall be the withdrawal value of the account redeemed, or such greater price as determined by the board of directors.

If the notice of redemption has been duly given, and if on or before the redemption date the funds necessary for the redemption has been set aside so as to be and continue to be available therefor, interest upon the accounts called for redemption shall cease to accrue from and after the interest date specified as the redemption date, and all rights with respect to the accounts shall immediately, after the redemption date, terminate, except only any right of depositors of record to receive the redemption price without additional accrual of interest after the redemption date.

All account books or other evidence of deposit accounts that have been validly called for redemption must be tendered for payment within seven (7) years from the date of redemption designated in the redemption notice; otherwise, they shall be cancelled, the funds set aside for the accounts shall become the property of the association, and all claims of the former depositors against the association shall be barred forever.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.20; T.C.A., § 45-1420.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

45-3-521. Statute of limitations on accounts.

All claims shall be barred in this state on any inactive account; provided, that at least sixty (60) days before the claim becomes barred, the association shall mail by registered or certified mail a notice of the imminent barring of all claims to the depositor at the depositor's last known address.

For the purposes of this section, “inactive account” means an account with respect to which there has been an absence for at least seven (7) years of:

Additions to the account other than creditings of interest;

Withdrawals from the account; and

Written communication from the depositor.

In the case of an account that provides for a specified contractual time, the seven (7) years shall commence on the maturity date of the account.

Acts 1978, ch. 708, § 2.21; T.C.A., § 45-1421.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Uniform Unclaimed Property Act, property held by banking or financial organizations, §66-29-104.

45-3-522. Final adjustment of statements of account.

When a statement of account has been rendered by an association to a depositor or has been mailed to the depositor's last known address, showing the condition of the depositor's account, the account shall, after the period of six (6) years from the date of the rendition of the statement, in the event no objection to the statement in writing has been theretofore made by the depositor or suit brought to correct same, be deemed finally adjusted and settled and its correctness conclusively presumed, and the depositor shall thereafter be barred from questioning the account for any cause.

Associations shall accordingly not be required to preserve or keep their records or files relating thereto for a longer period than six (6) years.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve the depositor from the duty imposed by law of exercising due diligence in the examination of the account and vouchers, if any, accompanying the statement, when rendered by the association and of immediate notification to the association upon discovery of any error in the statement, nor from the legal consequences of neglect of that duty.

Nothing herein shall be construed as exempting associations from compliance with title 66, chapter 29 to the extent applicable.

Acts 1983, ch. 191, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-3-523. Association deposits and collections.

To the extent that an association accepts demand deposit accounts, or offers checking accounts or negotiable orders of withdrawal, the Uniform Commercial Code setting out the relationship between a payor bank and its customers, compiled in title 47, chapter 4, part 4, shall apply to the association, and all references to “banks” are deemed references to “associations.”

Acts 1983, ch. 191, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-3-524. Payment and negotiation of check when no estate has been opened or the estate has been closed.

Notwithstanding § 30-2-317, where no executor or administrator of a decedent has qualified and given notice of the person's qualifications to the savings institution, or where the qualified executor or administrator of a decedent has been discharged and a check or checks made payable to the decedent or the decedent's estate is presented to the savings institution for payment or collection, the savings institution may, in its discretion, and at any time after ninety (90) days from the death of the deceased, negotiate or send for collection and pay out the proceeds of one or more checks made payable to the decedent or the decedent's estate, whether written or electronic, all sums that do not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in the aggregate:

To the executor named in any will known to the savings institution whether probated or not;

To any personal representative appointed by a court whether active or discharged; or

In the absence of knowledge of a purported will naming a surviving executor or an administrator to the:

Surviving spouse; or

Next of kin.

In the case of conflicting claims, the order of priority shall be that set out in subdivision (a)(1).

The receipt of any guardian, administrator or executor, duly appointed or qualified by the courts of this state, or any other state, or of any spouse or next of kin acknowledging the negotiation, payment or transfer of funds of a check, standing in the name of the person whose estate the fiduciary represents, shall be a good and sufficient acquittance for payment or transfer and shall constitute a valid defense in favor of the savings institution against the demands or claims of all parties.

The negotiation or payment of a check under this section without an endorsement of the payee or with the endorsement of a person authorized by this section to negotiate the check shall not be a violation of or give rise to any claim under title 47, chapter 3 or 4.

No savings institution shall be liable for damages, penalty or tax by reason of any payment made pursuant to this section.

Acts 2014, ch. 597, § 3; 2016, ch. 804, §§ 7-9.

45-3-525. Acknowledgement or affidavit — Guaranty.

A savings institution shall require any persons seeking to cash checks payable to a decedent as provided in § 45-2-711 to deliver to the savings institution an affidavit, given under the penalty of perjury, in a form acceptable to the savings institution or in a form that, at the minimum, contains the following:

The name of the decedent;

The decedent's date of death;

The amount and payor of any checks, if the funds are from checks or electronic payments;

The identity of the creditor or creditors to whom the funds are to be paid, if the funds are to be paid directly to a creditor of the decedent or the decedent's estate; and

If the funds are to be paid other than to a creditor of the decedent or the decedent's estate, the affiant shall:

Identify the decedent's surviving spouse and heirs at law, and provide their residence addresses; and

Affirmatively state that:

There are no unpaid creditors of the decedent;

There are no unpaid income, gift, estate, inheritance or other transfer taxes owed by the decedent or the estate of the decedent; and

The funds distributed to the affiant will be distributed by the affiant as provided in any will or testamentary document or in appropriate shares to the decedent's heirs at law.

A savings institution may, in its discretion, require any persons seeking to collect monies from a deceased depositor's account or accounts, as provided in § 45-2-708, to deliver to the savings institution an affidavit, given under penalty of perjury in a form acceptable to the savings institution as provided in subsection (a).

A savings institution may require any person who obtains funds from a deposit account pursuant to § 45-2-708 or to negotiate checks pursuant to § 45-2-711 to provide an indemnity and guarantee to the savings institution in the amount of the funds obtained.

Acts 2014, ch. 597, § 3.